New Jersey, session 222, A2751.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1990, c.115 (C.54:32B-8.43) is amended to read as follows: 3.  Receipts from: (a) sales, renting or leasing of commercial trucks, truck tractors, tractors, semitrailers, and vehicles used in combination therewith, as defined in R.S.39:1-1, which are registered in New Jersey and (1) have a gross vehicle weight rating in excess of 26,000 pounds, (2) are operated actively and exclusively for the carriage of interstate freight pursuant to a certificate or permit issued by the Interstate Commerce Commission, or (3) are sold to a farmer and registered pursuant to R.S.39:3-24 or R.S.39:3-25 [and have a gross vehicle weight rating in excess of 18,000 pounds]; and (b) repair and replacement parts for such vehicles, are exempt from the tax imposed under the "Sales and Use Tax Act." A taxpayer claiming an exemption pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this section shall provide such documentation as required by the director to demonstrate that the taxpayer qualifies as a farmer. ["Gross] As used in this section: "gross vehicle weight rating" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of the single or combination vehicle and, if the manufacturer has not specified a value for a towed vehicle, means the value specified for the towing vehicle plus the loaded weight of the towed unit. (cf: P.L.1990, c.115, s.3) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.